Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.285

Teacher preparation programs.

Each Washington professional educator standards board-approved teacher preparation program, including an alternative route teacher certification program, must develop a plan regarding field placement of student teachers in accordance with RCW 28B.10.033.

[ 2019 c 295 s 203.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.